South Dakota, session 2026, HB1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-17B-2 be AMENDED:
12-17B-2. Any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system used in
an election shall must enable the a voter to cast a vote for all offices and on all measures
on which the voter is entitled to vote. No automatic tabulating, electronic ballot marking,
or election voting equipment system may be connected to the internet. No ballot marking
device may save or tabulate votes marked on any system.
Each system shall must fulfill the requirements for election assistance commission
standards certification for certification by the United States Election Assistance
Commission, and must be approved by the State Board of Elections prior to distribution
and use before the system may be distributed and used in this state. No system may be
approved unless the system fulfills the requirements as established by the State Board of
Elections. Any changes or modifications to an approved system shall must be approved
by the State Board of Elections prior to distribution and use before the system is
distributed and used in this state.
The State Board of Elections may not approve the use of:
(1) An automatic tabulating system or electronic ballot marking system that may be
connected to the internet; or
(2) A ballot marking system that can save or tabulate votes marked using the system.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-17B:
Before the State Board of Elections may approve any automatic tabulating or
electronic ballot marking system, the vendor responsible for the production of the system
must provide a copy of the system's software source code to the secretary of state. The
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.777.17 2 1314
board, in consultation with the vendor and the state chair of each political party, shall
select an independent person to examine the system's software source code. Upon
completion of the examination, the person shall file with the board a statement indicating
whether:
(1) The system functions as represented by the vendor; and
(2) The system's software source code is free from defects or other errors.
Any system's software source code is not open to public inspection. The
independent person conducting the examination of the system's software source code may
not disclose the system's software source code to any other person.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-17B:
Upon the approval of a new automatic tabulating system or electronic ballot
marking system, any system previously approved is no longer approved as of December
thirty-first following the approval of the new automatic tabulating or electronic ballot
marking system.
Upon the approval of an update to a system's software or operating system, any
software or operating system previously approved is no longer approved as of December
thirty-first following the approval of the update to software or operating system.
Any system approved prior to January 1, 2026, is no longer approved as of July 1,
2026, and must be approved by the State Board of Elections before the system is
distributed and used in this state.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-17B:
The vendor of an automatic tabulating system approved by the State Board of
Elections, pursuant to this chapter, and used by a jurisdiction in the conduct of an election
shall maintain the election system's software or operating system.
The vendor of an election system shall ensure that each election system is updated
to operate using the most current version of the system's operating system, software
patches, and antivirus software. Any election system that has not been updated to operate
using the most current version of the system's operating system, antivirus software, or
software patches is not approved and may not be used in an election.
If a system may not be used at an election, pursuant to this section, the jurisdiction
must tabulate the election results using a hand count of the ballots, and all costs incurred
by the jurisdiction as a result of conducting a manual count of the ballots must be paid by
the vendor of the system.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.777.17 3 1314
Section 5. That § 12-17B-5 be AMENDED:
12-17B-5. Not more than ten days prior to an election, the The person in charge
of the election shall conduct a test of the automatic tabulating equipment on the first
Saturday preceding the sixtieth day before the election, at nine a.m. local time, to
ascertain that whether the equipment will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and
on all measures. The test must be open to the public.
The person in charge of the election shall notify the county chair of each political
party with a candidate on the ballot, any independent candidate or candidate without party
affiliation on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or
referred measure or initiated constitutional amendment, of the testing of the automatic
tabulating equipment, one week two weeks before the test is conducted. The person in
charge of the election shall post notice of the time and place of the test in the same
manner as a public meeting agenda, pursuant to § 1-25-1.1. The person in charge of the
election shall post the notice of the time and place of the test to the secretary of state's
website.
If an errorless count by an automatic tabulating machine is achieved by the test,
the person in charge of the election shall must certify the machine. The State Board of
Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the certification of
properly functioning automatic tabulating equipment under this section.
If an error is detected, the cause of the error shall must be determined and
corrected. Once the error is corrected, the person in charge of the election shall conduct
a new test of the automatic tabulating equipment. The person in charge of the election
may not approve the automatic tabulating equipment until an errorless count is made. If
the automatic tabulating equipment does not produce an errorless count by the fiftieth
day before the election, the person in charge of the election may not use any automatic
tabulating equipment to tabulate the results of the election.
Any All additional testing required to achieve an errorless count must be open to
the public. The person in charge of the election shall post notice of the time and place of
an additional test in the same manner as a public meeting agenda, pursuant to § 1-25-
1.1. The person in charge of the election shall notify the county chair of each political
party with a candidate on the ballot, any independent candidate or candidate without party
affiliation on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or
referred measure or initiated constitutional amendment of the testing of the automatic
tabulating equipment twenty-four hours one week prior to the test. The person in charge
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.777.17 4 1314
of the election shall post the notice of the time and place of the additional test to the
secretary of state's website.
A copy of each report produced by the automatic tabulating equipment during the
testing of the equipment must be available for public inspection at no charge, during
regular office hours, within twenty-four hours after the completion of a test conducted
pursuant to this section.
The secretary of state shall provide each county auditor with the contact
information for any independent candidate, candidate without party affiliation appearing
on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or referred
measure or initiated constitutional amendment in the auditor's county.
Section 6. That § 12-17B-5.1 be AMENDED:
12-17B-5.1. The person in charge of the election shall test the automatic
tabulating equipment by processing a predetermined number of ballots on which are
recorded a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and measure. The
test of the automatic tabulating equipment must also include at least one ballot for each
office that has votes exceeding the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of
the automatic tabulating equipment to reject invalid votes. During the test, a different
number of valid votes must be assigned to each candidate for an office and for and against
each measure. A ballot used to test the automatic tabulating equipment must be clearly
marked as a test ballot. After each test, the testing materials and the predetermined
number of ballots used during the test must be sealed and retained in the same manner
as election materials after an election.
If the person in charge of the election fails to test the automatic tabulating
equipment in the way required by this section, the automatic tabulating equipment may
not be used to tabulate the votes cast at the election.
Section 7. That § 12-17B-12 be AMENDED:
12-17B-12. The test required by § 12-17B-5 shall be repeated immediately before
the start of the official count of the ballots.
A copy of each report produced by the automatic tabulating equipment during the
testing of the equipment must be available for public inspection at no charge, during
regular office hours, within twenty-four hours after the completion of a test conducted
pursuant to this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.777.17 5 1314
Section 8. That § 12-17B-18 be AMENDED:
12-17B-18. Within fifteen days following the completion of the state canvassing
of a primary or general election, If the results of a primary or general election are
tabulated using automatic tabulating equipment, the auditor of each county shall conduct
a post-election audit of the ballots cast in the election following the procedures listed in
this section and §§ 12-17B-19 to 12-17B-25, inclusive, beginning at nine a.m. local time
on the first Friday following the primary or general election. The county auditor shall
appoint a county auditing board of sufficient size to promptly complete the audit.
The members of the county auditing board may not all be members of the same
political party. A member of the county auditing board must be a registered voter in the
county in which the audit takes place. An individual may not serve on the county auditing
board if the individual is a candidate for the office that is on the ballot being audited.
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
prescribing the oath that each member of a county auditing board must take prior to
discharging any duties.
Section 9. That § 12-17B-19 be AMENDED:
12-17B-19. The office of the secretary of state shall reimburse each county for
the cost of any post-election audit required by §§ 12-17B-18 to 12-17B-25 12-17B-22,
inclusive. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
administering the reimbursement process and defining reimbursable expenses and
reimbursement rates for post-election audits.
The secretary of state may not reimburse a county for the cost of a post-election
audit if the person in charge of the election did not test the automatic tabulating equipment
as required by § 12-17B-5 or 12-17B-5.1.
Section 10. That § 12-17B-20 be AMENDED:
12-17B-20. The post-election audit must be conducted in five percent of the
precincts each precinct in the county by manually counting all votes cast in two all contests
and comparing the results of the manual count to the results for those precincts at the
county canvass. The county auditor shall select the precincts for the audit at random
without the use of a computer in public during the meeting of the county canvassing board.
If the combined total of all ballots cast in the precincts selected does not exceed one
hundred ballots, then additional precincts must be randomly selected until the total of all
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.777.17 6 1314
ballots exceeds one hundred ballots. For the purposes of this section, the term precinct
includes vote centers, but does not include any precinct designated as an absentee
precinct.
The county auditor shall select the contests for the audit at random without the
use of a computer in public during the meeting of the county canvassing board. One
contest randomly selected for the audit must be a statewide contest. If there are no
statewide contests on the ballot, the auditor randomly shall select another contest on the
ballot. If there is only one contest on the ballot, that contest must be audited.
Upon completion of the post-election audit, the person in charge of the election
shall reseal and retain the ballots as provided in § 12-20-20.
Section 11. That § 12-17B-22 be AMENDED:
12-17B-22. The county auditor shall send the results of the post-election audit to
the secretary of state and present the results of the audit to the county commission at its
next meeting. The results of the audit shall be included in the minutes of the county
commission meeting canvassing board.
The secretary of state shall publish the results of the post-election audit on the
secretary of state's website.
Section 12. That § 12-20-38 be AMENDED:
12-20-38. The Board of Canvassers canvassing board for both primary and
general elections shall at the time provided by § 12-20-36 proceed to open the returns
the results of the post-election audit conducted pursuant to §§ 12-17B-18 to 12-17B-22,
inclusive, from the various voting precincts in the county, and make abstracts of the votes
cast for each of the candidates and each of the issues. Each of the abstracts The
canvassers shall sign and certify each abstract of the votes made shall be signed and
certified by the canvassers, under the seal of the county auditor, and be deposited shall
deposit the abstracts in the office of the auditor.
Section 13. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-21:
If a recount is conducted pursuant to this chapter, the recount must be conducted
by manually counting all the votes cast in the election subject to the recount.
The person in charge of the election shall sign and seal the new returns and make
the new returns public.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.777.17 7 1314
Section 14. That § 12-17B-16 be REPEALED.
Automatic tabulating equipment must be tested prior to a recount or election
contest as provided in §§ 12-17B-5 to 12-17B-5.2, inclusive, and then the official ballots
must be recounted. The recount board shall certify the new returns printed by the
automatic tabulating equipment as the official returns for the election. The person in
charge of the election shall sign and seal the new returns printed by the automatic
tabulating equipment and make the new returns public.
Section 15. That § 12-17B-23 be REPEALED.
If the results of the post-election audit show a discrepancy in the results greater
than the margin by which any contest for elected office on the ballot in the county was
decided, the auditor shall notify the candidates for that office. Any candidate who receives
a notification from the county auditor shall have an additional seven days from the date
from when the auditor sends the notification to file a verified petition requesting a recount
of the official returns pursuant to §§ 12-21-10 or 12-21-11. The petition may be filed
regardless of the margin by which the contest was decided.
Section 16. That § 12-17B-24 be REPEALED.
If a recount of any contest is conducted in a county, the county auditor is not
required to conduct a post-election audit pursuant to § 12-17B-18.
Section 17. That § 12-17B-25 be REPEALED.
The county auditor shall reseal and retain the ballots upon the completion of a
post-election audit pursuant to § 12-20-31.
Section 18. Any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system that had been
previously approved by the State Board of Elections on or before June 30, 2026, must receive
approval from the State Board of Elections on or after July 1, 2026, before the system may
be used in an election conducted in this state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.